Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2008
Approved program, defined.

Approved program means a program for the education of physician assistants which is accredited by the Accreditation Review Commission on Education for the Physician Assistant or its predecessor or successor agency and which the board formally approves.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 666;

Laws 2009, LB195, § 37;

Laws 2020, LB755, § 5.